Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 6 Miscellaneous

47-20-60.
State auditor authorized to provide personnel to carry out duties under chapter; funds authorized; cooperation of state officials, agencies, and employees.

The state auditor shall be authorized to employ or contract with actuaries and other personnel to carry out the duties assigned to that officer by this chapter. Upon their approval by the Legislative Services Committee, expenses incurred by the state auditor in carrying out such duties shall be paid from funds appropriated or available to the legislative branch of the state government. When authorized to do so by the Legislative Services Committee, and such authorization may be on a continuing basis by direction of the Legislative Services Committee entered upon its minutes, the legislative fiscal officer, upon certification by the state auditor of expenses incurred to carry out the duties assigned to that officer by this chapter, is authorized to expend legislative funds to pay such expenses.

Retirement system administrators, state officials and employees, and officials and employees of political subdivisions are authorized and directed to cooperate with and assist the state auditor in carrying out the duties assigned to that officer by this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-20-60

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1368, § 1.

47-20-61.
Certificates and summaries of actuarial investigations attached to enrolled Act.

The enrolled Act resulting from a bill which is subject to the legislative procedures provided by this chapter shall have attached thereto the original or a true and correct copy of all certificates and summaries of actuarial investigations submitted by the state auditor pursuant to the requirements of this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-20-61

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1368, § 1.

47-20-62.
Effective date of chapter; consideration of fiscal retirement bills by 1984 regular session.

This chapter shall become effective on January 1, 1984. Only nonfiscal retirement bills may be introduced at the 1984 regular session of the General Assembly. Retirement bills having a fiscal impact which were introduced at the 1983 regular session and which are still pending at the 1984 regular session shall be subject to the requirements of Code Section 47-20-50, except that the amount determined by actuarial investigation under paragraph (10) of subsection (a) of Code Section 47-20-36 shall be determined by the director of the Office of Planning and Budget and the state auditor pursuant to Code Sections 28-5-42 and 28-5-43, relating to fiscal notes.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-20-62

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1368, § 1.

47-20-63.
[Repealed] Requirements for exempting bills regarding Georgia Firemen’s Pension Fund from chapter provisions.

History.

Ga. L. 1989, p. 48, § 1, and Ga. L. 1991, p. 130, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 1994, p. 315, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

47-20-64.
[Repealed] Exemption for 1991 bill amending Code Section 47-1-30.

History.

Ga. L. 1991, p. 356, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 1994, p. 315, § 2, effective July 1, 1994.